District of Columbia statutes.
47-1090

Washington Latin Public Charter School property; Lot 0800, Square 3327.

(a)

The real property located at 5210 2nd Street, N.W., and described as Lot 0800, Square 3327, shall be exempt from real property taxation and possessory interest taxation so long as the real property continues to be owned or occupied under a ground lease by Washington Latin Public Charter School or Latin Rudolph QALICB, LLC.

(b)

Any transfer, assignment, or other disposition of all or any portion of the real property described in subsection (a) of this section, including as assignment of leasehold interest in the real property or a sublease of the real property between Washington Latin Public Charter School and Latin Rudolph QALICB, LLC, or a deed of trust with respect to the real property granted by Washington Public Charter School or Latin Rudolph QALICB, LLC, to a third party lender, shall be exempt from the tax imposed under § 42-1103 and § 47-903.

(c)

The exemptions set forth in this section shall apply:

(1)

To successor corporations or entities organized or incorporated by Washington Latin Public Charter School for the purposes of receiving New Market Tax Credits administered by the U.S. Treasury Department; and

(2)

As of April 12, 2013.

History

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 7303(b), 60 DCR 12472

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of a section designated as § 47-1089, concerning the Washington Latin Public Charter School property, see § 2 of the Washington Latin Public Charter School Campus Property Tax Exemption Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-595, January 12, 2013, 60 DCR 997).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 7303 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 7303 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Section 7301 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle DD of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Title-Holding Entity Real Property Tax Exemption Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.